src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
# Lule Sámi morphological analyser

# Definitions for Multichar_Symbols

## Tags for POS

* **+N** = Noun
* **+A** = Adjective
* **+Adv** = Adverb
* **+V** = Verb
* **+Pron** = Pronouns
* **+CS** = Subjunction
* **+CC** = Conjunction
* **+Po** = Postposition
* **+Pr** = Preposition
* **+Interj** = Interjection
* **+Pcle** = Particle
* **+Num** = Numeral
* **+TODO** = Code for items that have not been modeled yet
* **+Dyn** = Code dynamic acronyms

### Tags for sub-POS

* **+Prop** = Propernouns
* **+ACR** = Acronym
`@CODE` = telephone number (beta testings)

### Pronoun subtypes

* **+Pers** = Personal pronoun
* **+Dem** = Demonstrative pronoun
* **+Interr** = Interrogative pronoun
* **+Refl** = reflexive pronoun
* **+Recipr** = reciprocal pronoun
* **+Rel** = relative pronoun
* **+Indef** = indefinite pronoun
* **+Coll** = collective numerals
* **+Arab** = arabic numerals
* **+Rom** = remertall

## Error tags

All Err-tags must have a normative form as lemma except Err/Lex

* **+Err/Orth** = Substandard. An ungrammatical, non-normative form of normative lemma.
* **+Err/Lex** = No normative lemma
* **+Err/Cmp** = No normative compound, often wrong first part of cmp (in other case than nom or gen, or adv og pronoun)
* **+Err/Der** = Lemmas that break with regular derivation rules, both morphologically and semantically
* **+Err/Infl** = Lemmas that break with normative inflection rules, often used with morphological changes
* **+Err/MissingSpace** = indicates that there is a missing space, causing an orthographic error. Used for "goadedagi", when it should be "goade dagi"
* **+Err/Hyph** = when there is a hyphen where none should have been
* **+Err/SpaceCmp** = used for compounds written apart - only retained in the HFST Grammar Checker disambiguation analyser

## Usage restriction tags

* **+Use/Marg** – Marginal, but normative lemmas. Not in speller.
* **+Use/-Spell** – Excluded from speller
* **+Use/-PLX** – Excluded from PLX speller
* **+Use/-PMatch** – Do not include in fst's made for hfst-pmatch
* **+Use/SpellNoSugg** – Recognized, but not suggested in speller
* **+Use/Circ** – Circular path
* **+Use/CircN** – Circular number path
* **+Use/Ped** – Remove from pedagogical speller
* **+Use/NG** – Do not generate, only for Oahpa and MT. In speller.
* **+Use/MT** – Generate for MT only, for restricting analyses needed
* **+Use/NGminip** – Not for miniparadigm in VD dicts
* **+Use/NotDNorm** – For words without formal normalization. Divvun suggest that this shouldn't be normative.
* **+Use/DNorm** – For words without formal normalization.  Divvun suggest that this should be normative. Included in speller.
* **+Use/PMatch** – Only use in fst's targeted for `hfst-pmatch`
* **+Use/Derrog** – Derrogatory word. Recognized, but not suggested in speller, same as SpellNoSugg
* **+Use/GC** – **only** retained in the HFST Grammar Checker disambiguation analyser
* **+Use/-GC** – **never** retained in the HFST Grammar Checker disambiguation analyser
* **+Use/TTS** – **only** retained in the HFST Text-To-Speech disambiguation tokeniser
* **+Use/-TTS** – **never** retained in the HFST Text-To-Speech disambiguation tokeniser

## Dialect and Area tags
* **+Area/SE** - Used in Sweden only
* **+Area/NO** - Used in Norway only
* **+Dial/N** Used in the northern areas.  Some might say that
these words are sme-words, but they are used by lulesamis in
the northern part of the dialect area. Words like "válmas"
* **+Dial/S** Used in the southern areas
* **+Dial/SH** Short forms

## Compounding tags

The tags are of the following form:
* **+CmpNP/xxx** - Normative (N), Position (P), ie. the tag describes what
position the tagged word can be in in a compound
* **+CmpN/xxx**  - Normative (N) **form** ie. the tag describes what
form the tagged word should use when making compounds
* **+Cmp/xxx**   - Descriptive compounding tags, ie. tags that*describes*
what form a word actually is using in a compound

### Normative/prescriptive compounding tags

These govern compound behaviour for normative tools like the speller, ie. what a compound **SHOULD BE**.

The first part of the component may be ..
* **+CmpN/Sg** = Singular
* **+CmpN/SgN** = Singular Nominative
* **+CmpN/SgG** = Singular Genitive
* **+CmpN/PlG** = Plural Genitive
* **+CmpN/Attr** = Attributive

This part of the component can ..

* +CmpNP/All - ... be in all positions, **default**, this tag does not have to be written
* +CmpNP/First - ... only be first part in a compound or alone
* +CmpNP/Pref - ... only **first** part in a compound, NEVER alone
* +CmpNP/Last - ... only be last part in a compound or alone
* +CmpNP/Suff - ... only **last** part in a compound, NEVER alone
* +CmpNP/None - ... not take part in compounds
* +CmpNP/Only - ... only be part of a compound, i.e. can never
be used alone, but can appear in any position

The second part of the compound may require that the previous (left part) is (and thus overrides the regular CmpN tags):

* +CmpN/SgLeft  Singular to the left
* +CmpN/SgNomLeft  Singular nominative to the left
* +CmpN/SgGenLeft  Singular genitive to the left
* +CmpN/PlGenLeft  Plural genitive to the left

But these tags can again be overriden by the first word in a compound, if this part of the compound is tagged with a def tag:

* **+CmpN/Def**  Left override
* **+CmpN/DefSgGen**  Overrides left tag, requires SgGen form
* **+CmpN/DefPlGen**  Overrides left tag, requires PlGen form

## Descriptive compounding tags
Tags for compound analysis - this is what a compound actually is.
Some of these tags are also used in combination with the
above normative tags to actually enforce compound restrictions in the fst.

* **+Cmp/Sg**  Singular
* **+Cmp/SgNom**  Singular Nominative
* **+Cmp/SgGen**  Singular Genitive
* **+Cmp/PlGen**  Plural Genitiv
* **+Cmp/PlNom**  Plural Nominative
* **+Cmp/Attr**  Attribute
* **+Cmp/Sh**  testing ShCmp
* **+Cmp/Long**  Long for om SgNom when short form is default, tjåhkaNIBMEbievddegirjje and bierjjeDAHKAiehket
* **+Cmp/Unass**  Unassimiled as first part of Cmp, e.g. telegram- in stead for telegrámma-
* **+Cmp**  Dynamic compound - this tag should always be part of a dynamic compound.
It is important for Apertium, and useful in other cases as well.
* **+Cmp/SplitR**  This is a split compound with the other part to the right:
"Arbeids- og inkluderingsdepartementet" => Arbeids- = +Cmp/SplitR
* **+Cmp/SplitL**  This is a split compound with the other part to the left
Compound with (optional) hyphen, heavily weighted
Obligatory hyphen, not as badly weighed as +Cmp/Hyph

# Inflectional Tags
## Tags for Case and Number Inflection

*  **+Sg** = Singular number
*  **+Du** = Dual number
*  **+Pl** = Plural number
*  **+Ess** = Essive case
*  **+Nom** = Nominative case
*  **+Gen** = Genitive case
*  **+Acc** = Accusative case
*  **+Ill** = Illative case
*  **+Loc** = Locative case
*  **+Com** = Comitative case
*  **+Ine** = Inesive case
*  **+Ela** = Elative case
*  **+Par** = Partitive case
*  **+Abe** = Abessive case

## Possessive tags

* **+PxSg1** possessive suffix singular first person
* **+PxSg2** possessive suffix singular second person
* **+PxSg3** possessive suffix singular third person
* **+PxDu1** possessive suffix dual first person
* **+PxDu2** possessive suffix dual second person
* **+PxDu3** possessive suffix dual third person
* **+PxPl1** possessive suffix plural first person
* **+PxPl2** possessive suffix plural second person
* **+PxPl3** possessive suffix plural plural person

## Adjective specific tags
* +Attr Attribute
* +Card
* +Ord  CHECK THIS! In closed-sme there are +Ord entries without circ. tag

## Verbal inflection
* +Ind Indicative mood
* +Prs Present tense
* +Prt Past tense
* +Pot Potensial mood
* +Cond conditional mood
* +Imprt Imperative mood
* +Sg1 singular first person
* +Sg2 singular second person
* +Sg3 singular third person
* +Du1 dual first person
* +Du2 dual second person
* +Du3 dual third person
* +Pl1 plural first person
* +Pl2 plural second person
* +Pl3 plural plural person
* +Inf infinitive
* +Ger  gerundium
* +ConNeg = the main verb form used with negation verb. Like *bårå* in *Iv bårå guolev*.
* +Neg  negation verb
* +ImprtII  second imperative mood
* +PrsPrc  present participle
* +PrfPrc  past participle
* +Sup  supinum
* +VGen verb genitive
* +VAbess verb abessive
* +Actio Actio

## Other tags
* +ABBR
* +Symbol = independent symbols in the text stream, like £, €, ©
* +ACR
* +CLB
* +PUNCT
* +LEFT
* +RIGHT +MIDDLE
* **+CLBfinal**  Sentence final abbreviated expression ending in full stop, so that the full stop is ambiguous
* ^GUESSNOUNROOT
* +TV !
* +IV !  Transitivity tags
* **+G3** Grade 2-3 for homonymies with grade 1-2, +N+G3
* **+G7** Grade 3, no consonant gradation, +N+G7
* +Multi  Multiword phrase tag
* +Guess  for the name guesser
* +NomAg Actor Noun From Verb - Nomen Agentis

## Lexeme disambiguation = homonym tags
* **+Hom1**:  Homonymy
* **+Hom2**:  Homonymy

## Stem variant tags
* +v1 - variant 1
* +v2 - variant 2
* +v3 - variant 3
* +v4 - variant 4
* +v5 - variant 5

### Question and Focus particles:
* +Qst
* +Clt
* +SentInit Sentence initial form of "liehket"
* +Cltl
* +Foc  These two are only found in SMJ - do we need them?
* +Foc/ge
* +Foc/gen
* +Foc/ga
* +Foc/Neg-k
* +Foc/Pos-k

### Other tags
* **+MWE**  multi word expressions, goes to abbr
* **+Span** - used for numerical expressions denoting spans or intervals, like 5-10, 2012-2015, etc  
* **+Sh**  Short form
* **+Long**  Long form
* **+Gram/Comp** = Inherent comp, lexicalized derivation
* **+Gram/Superl** = Inherent superl, lexicalized derivation
* **+Gram/Dimin** = Inherent diminutive, lexicalized derivation
* **+Gram/NomAg** = Inherent Actor Noun From Verb - Nomen Agentis, lexicalized derivation
* **+Gram/r** = Inherent -r derivation. guollit-guollár
* **+Gram/NomAct** = Inherent Actio Noun From Verb - Nomen Actionis, lexicalized derivation
* **+Gram/NomInstr** = Inherent Intsrumental noun From Verb, Nomen instrumentalis,lexicalized derivation
* **+Gram/TAbbr**:  Transitive abbreviation (it needs an argument)
* **+Gram/NoAbbr**:  Intransitive abbreviations that are homonymous
* **+Gram/TNumAbbr**:  Transitive abbreviation if the following
* **+Gram/NumNoAbbr**:  Transitive abbreviations for which numerals
* **+Gram/TIAbbr**:  Both transitive and intransitive abbreviation
* **+Gram/IAbbr**:  Intransitive abbreviation (it takes no argument)
* **+Gram/3syll**:  trisyllabic verbs
* **!+Gram/SentInit**:  copula verb le-, tag is replaced by +SentInit

## Semantic tags to help disambiguation & syntactic analysis

These tags should always be located just before the POS tag.
